Mississippi, session 2026, HB395.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 27-7-22.39, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-7-22.39.  (1)  As used in this section: (a)  "Low-income residents" means persons whose household income is less than one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal poverty level. (b)  "Qualifying charitable organization" means a charitable organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code or is a designated community action agency that receives community services block grant program monies pursuant to 42 USC 9901.  The organization must spend at least fifty percent (50%) of its budget on services to residents of this state who receive temporary assistance for needy families benefits or low-income residents of this state and their households or to children who have a chronic illness or physical, intellectual, developmental or emotional disability who are residents of this state.  A charitable organization that is exempt from federal income tax under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that meets all other requirements of this paragraph except that it does not spend at least fifty percent (50%) of its overall budget in Mississippi may be a qualifying charitable organization if it spends at least fifty percent (50%) of its Mississippi budget on services to qualified individuals in Mississippi and it certifies to the department that one hundred percent (100%) of the voluntary cash contributions from the taxpayer will be spent on services to qualified individuals in Mississippi.  Taxpayers choosing to make donations through an umbrella charitable organization that collects donations on behalf of member charities shall designate that the donation be directed to a member charitable organization that would qualify under this section on a stand-alone basis. Qualifying charitable organization does not include any entity that provides, pays for or provides coverage of abortions or that financially supports any other entity that provides, pays for or provides coverage of abortions. (c)  "Qualifying foster care charitable organization" means a qualifying charitable organization that each operating year provides services to at least one hundred (100) qualified individuals in this state and spends at least fifty percent (50%) of its budget on services to qualified individuals in this state.  A charitable organization that is exempt from federal income tax under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that meets all other requirements of this paragraph except that it does not spend at least fifty percent (50%) of its overall budget in Mississippi may be a qualifying foster care charitable organization if it spends at least fifty percent (50%) of its Mississippi budget on services to qualified individuals in Mississippi and it certifies to the department that one hundred percent (100%) of the voluntary cash contributions from the taxpayer will be spent on services to qualified individuals in Mississippi.  For the purposes of this paragraph, "qualified individual" means a child in a foster care placement program established by the Department of Child Protection Services, a child placed under the Safe Families for Children model, or a child at significant risk of entering a foster care placement program established by the Department of Child Protection Services. (d) "Services" means: (i)  Cash assistance, medical care, child care, food, clothing, shelter, and job-placement services or any other assistance that is reasonably necessary to meet immediate basic needs and that is provided and used in this state; (ii)  Job-training or education services or funding for parents, foster parents or guardians; or (iii)  Job-training or education services or funding provided as part of a foster care independent living program. (2)  (a)  Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, a credit is allowed against the taxes imposed by this chapter for voluntary cash contributions by the taxpayer during the taxable year to a qualifying charitable organization, other than a qualifying foster care charitable organization, not to exceed: (i)  Through calendar year 2022, the lesser of Four Hundred Dollars ($400.00) or the amount of the contribution in any taxable year for a single individual or a head of household; and for calendar year 2023 and each calendar year thereafter, the lesser of One Thousand Two Hundred Dollars ($1,200.00) or the amount of the contribution in any taxable year for a single individual or a head of household. (ii)  Through calendar year 2022, the lesser of Eight Hundred Dollars ($800.00) or the amount of the contribution in any taxable year for a married couple filing a joint return; and for calendar year 2023 and each calendar year thereafter, the lesser of Two Thousand Four Hundred Dollars ($2,400.00) or the amount of the contribution in any taxable year for a married couple filing a joint return. (b)  From and after January 1, 2023, a credit is also allowed against ad valorem taxes assessed and levied on real property for voluntary cash contributions made by the individual taxpayer during the taxable year to a qualifying charitable organization, other than a qualifying foster care charitable organization.  The amount of credit that may be utilized by a taxpayer in a taxable year shall be limited to an amount not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of the total tax liability of the taxpayer for ad valorem taxes assessed and levied on real property.  Any tax credit claimed under this paragraph but not used in any taxable year may be carried forward for five (5) consecutive years from the close of the tax year in which the credits were earned. (3)  (a)  A separate credit is allowed against the taxes imposed by this chapter for voluntary cash contributions during the taxable year to a qualifying foster care charitable organization.  A contribution to a qualifying foster care charitable organization does not qualify for, and shall not be included in, any credit amount under subsection (2) of this section.  If the voluntary cash contribution by the taxpayer is to a qualifying foster care charitable organization, the credit shall not exceed: (i)  Through calendar year 2022, the lesser of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or the amount of the contribution in any taxable year for a single individual or a head of household; and for calendar year 2023 and each calendar year thereafter, the lesser of One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) or the amount of the contribution in any taxable year for a single individual or a head of household. (ii)  Through calendar year 2022, the lesser of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or the amount of the contribution in any taxable year for a married couple filing a joint return; and for calendar year 2023 and each calendar year thereafter, the lesser of Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00) or the amount of the contribution in any taxable year for a married couple filing a joint return. (b)  From and after January 1, 2023, a credit is also allowed against ad valorem taxes assessed and levied on real property for voluntary cash contributions made by the individual taxpayer during the taxable year to a qualifying foster care charitable organization.  The amount of credit that may be utilized by a taxpayer in a taxable year shall be limited to an amount not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of the total tax liability of the taxpayer for ad valorem taxes assessed and levied on real property.  Any tax credit claimed under this paragraph but not used in any taxable year may be carried forward for five (5) consecutive years from the close of the tax year in which the credits were earned. (4)  Subsections (2) and (3) of this section provide separate credits against taxes imposed by this chapter depending on the recipients of the contributions.  A taxpayer, including a married couple filing a joint return, in the same taxable year, may either or both: (a)  Contribute to a qualifying charitable organization, other than a qualifying foster care charitable organization, and claim a credit under subsection (2) of this section. (b)  Contribute to a qualifying foster care charitable organization and claim a credit under subsection (3) of this section. (5)  A husband and wife who file separate returns for a taxable year in which they could have filed a joint return may each claim only one-half (1/2) of the tax credit that would have been allowed for a joint return. (6)  Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, if the allowable tax credit exceeds the taxes otherwise due under this chapter on the claimant's income, or if there are no taxes due under this chapter, the taxpayer may carry forward the amount of the claim not used to offset the taxes under this chapter for not more than five (5) consecutive taxable years' income tax liability. (7)  The credit allowed by this section is in lieu of a deduction pursuant to Section 170 of the Internal Revenue Code and taken for state tax purposes. (8)  Taxpayers taking a credit authorized by this section shall provide the name of the qualifying charitable organization and the amount of the contribution to the department on forms provided by the department. (9)  A qualifying charitable organization shall provide the department with a written certification that it meets all criteria to be considered a qualifying charitable organization.  The organization shall also notify the department of any changes that may affect the qualifications under this section. (10)  The charitable organization's written certification must be signed by an officer of the organization under penalty of perjury.  The written certification shall include the following: (a)  Verification of the organization's status under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code or verification that the organization is a designated community action agency that receives community services block grant program monies pursuant to 42 USC 9901. (b)  Financial data indicating the organization's budget for the organization's prior operating year and the amount of that budget spent on services to residents of this state who either: (i)  Receive temporary assistance for needy families benefits; (ii)  Are low-income residents of this state; (iii)  Are children who have a chronic illness or physical, intellectual, developmental or emotional disability; or (iv)  Are children in a foster care placement program established by the Department of Child Protection Services, children placed under the Safe Families for Children model or children at significant risk of entering a foster care placement program established by the Department of Child Protection Services. (c)  A statement that the organization plans to continue spending at least fifty percent (50%) of its budget on services to residents of this state who receive temporary assistance for needy families benefits, who are low-income residents of this state, who are children who have a chronic illness or physical, intellectual, developmental or emotional disability or who are children in a foster care placement program established by the Department of Child Protection Services, children placed under the Safe Families for Children model or children at significant risk of entering a foster care placement program established by the Department of Child Protection Services.  A charitable organization that is exempt from federal income tax under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that meets all other requirements for a qualifying charitable organization or qualifying foster care charitable organization except that it does not spend at least fifty percent (50%) of its overall budget in Mississippi shall submit a statement that it spends at least fifty percent (50%) of its Mississippi budget on services to qualified individuals in Mississippi and that one hundred percent (100%) of the voluntary cash contributions it receives from Mississippi taxpayers will be spent on services to qualified individuals in Mississippi. (d)  In the case of a foster care charitable organization, a statement that each operating year it provides services to at least one hundred (100) qualified individuals in this state. (e)  A statement that the organization does not provide, pay for or provide coverage of abortions and does not financially support any other entity that provides, pays for or provides coverage of abortions. (f)  Any other information that the department requires to administer this section. (11)  The department shall review each written certification and determine whether the organization meets all the criteria to be considered a qualifying charitable organization and notify the organization of its determination.  The department may also periodically request recertification from the organization.  The department shall compile and make available to the public a list of the qualifying charitable organizations. (12)  The aggregate amount of tax credits that may be awarded under this section in any calendar year shall not exceed Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00).  However, for calendar year 2021, and for each calendar year thereafter through calendar year 2025, the aggregate amount of tax credits that may be awarded under this section in any calendar year shall not exceed One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00), and for calendar year 2026, and for each calendar year thereafter, the aggregate amount of tax credits that may be awarded under this section in any calendar year shall not exceed Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00).  In addition, any tax credits not awarded under this section before June 1, 2020, may be allocated during calendar year 2020 under Section 27-7-22.41 for contributions by taxpayers to eligible charitable organizations described in Section 27-7-22.41(1)(b)(ii) as provided under such section, notwithstanding any limitation on the percentage of tax credits that may be allocated for such contributions. (13)  A taxpayer shall apply for credits with the department on forms prescribed by the department.  In the application the taxpayer shall certify to the department the dollar amount of the contributions made or to be made during the calendar year. Within thirty (30) days after the receipt of an application, the department shall allocate credits based on the dollar amount of contributions as certified in the application.  However, if the department cannot allocate the full amount of credits certified in the application due to the limit on the aggregate amount of credits that may be awarded under this section in a calendar year, the department shall so notify the applicant within thirty (30) days with the amount of credits, if any, that may be allocated to the applicant in the calendar year.  Once the department has allocated credits to a taxpayer, if the contribution for which a credit is allocated has not been made as of the date of the allocation, then the contribution must be made not later than sixty (60) days from the date of the allocation.  If the contribution is not made within such time period, the allocation shall be cancelled and returned to the department for reallocation.  Upon final documentation of the contributions, if the actual dollar amount of the contributions is lower than the amount estimated, the department shall adjust the tax credit allowed under this section. SECTION 2.  Nothing in this act shall affect or defeat any claim, assessment, appeal, suit, right or cause of action for taxes due or accrued under the income tax laws or ad valorem tax laws before the date on which this act becomes effective, whether such claims, assessments, appeals, suits or actions have been begun before the date on which this act becomes effective or are begun thereafter; and the provisions of the income tax laws and ad valorem tax laws are expressly continued in full force, effect and operation for the purpose of the assessment, collection and enrollment of liens for any taxes due or accrued and the execution of any warrant under such laws before the date on which this act becomes effective, and for the imposition of any penalties, forfeitures or claims for failure to comply with such laws. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after January 1, 2026.